Hawaii statutes.
§182-8 Number of leases; acreage
limitations; area covered by lease. The board is authorized to impose a
limitation on the number of leases or acres which a mining lessee or the mining
lessee's transferee may hold under such terms and conditions as the board
determines to be in the best interest of the State. No lease shall grant and
include an area of land exceeding four square miles of contiguous land, in
which the longest dimension of the area demised shall exceed its narrowest
dimension by more than six times unless otherwise approved by the board. [L
1963, c 11, pt of §1; Supp, §99A-8; HRS §182-8; am L 1978, c 135, §6; gen ch
1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next